Idaho, session 2026, H0667.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-115. DEFINITIONS -- N. (1) "National network" means highways
available to vehicles authorized by the provisions of the federal surface
transportation assistance act of 1982, as amended, and listed in 23 CFR part
658, appendix A.
(2) "Neighborhood electric vehicle." (See "Vehicle," section 49-123,
Idaho Code)
(3) "Noncommercial vehicle." (See "Vehicle," section 49-123, Idaho
Code)
(4) "Nondomiciled commercial learner's permit" or "nondomiciled com-
mercial driver's license" means a commercial learner's permit or a commer-
cial driver's license, respectively, issued by a state or other jurisdiction
under either of the following conditions:
(a) To an individual domiciled in a foreign country meeting the re-
quirements of 49 CFR 383.23(b)(1); or
(b) To an individual domiciled in another state meeting the require-
ments of 49 CFR 383.23(b)(2).
(5) (4) "Nonresident" means every person who is not a resident of this
state.
(6) (5) "Nonresident's operating privilege" means the privilege con-
ferred upon on a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the oper-
ation by that person of a motor vehicle, or the use of a vehicle owned by that
person, in this state.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-306. APPLICATION FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE, INSTRUCTION PERMIT,
COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT OR RESTRICTED SCHOOL ATTENDANCE DRIVING PER-
MIT. (1) Every application for any instruction permit, restricted school
attendance driving permit, or driver's license shall be made on a form
furnished by the department and shall be verified by the applicant before
a person authorized to administer oaths. Officers and employees of the


department, agents authorized by the department, and sheriffs and their
deputies are authorized to administer the oaths without charge.
(2) Every application for a permit, extension, driver's license, or
knowledge test shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee pursuant to this
subsection. Fee portions identified as going to the current expense fund
shall be retained by the issuing entity. If the issuing entity is the depart-
ment or an agent authorized by the department, other than the county, such
fee portion shall be deposited in the state highway account. All other re-
maining fee portions shall be remitted to the state treasurer. If the fee is
collected by a county, all remaining fee portions shall be paid over to the
county treasurer and the county treasurer shall remit such fees to the state
treasurer not less than monthly. The state treasurer shall immediately al-
locate such fees in accordance with the schedule identified following each
fee:
(a) Class A, B, C (4-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$40.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(b) Class A, B, C (8-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 to 63 years ............................................$60.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $8.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $41.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(c) Class A, B, C (3-year) license with endorsements --
age 18 to 21 years ............................................$30.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $3.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $19.50 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(d) Class A, B, C (1-year) license with endorsements -- age
20 years ....................................................$15.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $1.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $8.16 to the state highway account; and
(v) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;


(e) Class D (3-year) license -- age 15 to 18 years or age 18 to 21 years .
$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $3.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $4.00 to the driver training fund;
(v) $10.50 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(f) Class D (1-year) license -- age 17 or 20 years ..............$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $1.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $1.33 to the driver training fund;
(v) $6.83 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(g) Class D (4-year) license -- age 21 years and
older .......................................................$35.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $5.30 to the driver training fund;
(v) $12.70 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(h) Class D (8-year) or class A, B, C license with
endorsements -- age 21 to 63 years .............................$60.00
(i) $15.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $8.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $10.60 to the driver training fund;
(v) $20.40 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(i) Commercial learner's permit ..............................$29.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code; and
(iii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(j) Class D instruction permit ...............................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(k) Duplicate driver's license or permit ......................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;


(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(l) Driver's license extension ...............................$10.00
(i) $2.60 to the driver training account; and
(ii) $7.40 to the state highway account;
(m) License classification change (upgrade)...................$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(n) Endorsement addition ....................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $10.00 to the state highway account;
(o) Class A, B, C skills tests .................. not more than $200.00
(i) $10.00 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(p) Class D skills test ......................... not more than $35.00
(i) $6.50 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(q) Motorcycle endorsement skills test (amount charged retained by
entity administering the test).................. not more than $25.00;
(r) Knowledge test (fee retained by the entity administering
the test)....................................................$5.00;
(s) Seasonal driver's license ................................$44.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund established in
section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund established in section 57-830, Idaho Code; and
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account;
(t) Onetime motorcycle "M" endorsement .......................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(u) Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit ................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(v) Restricted driving permit or restricted school attendance
driving permit (fee to the state highway account) .............$60.00.
(3) The fee for any electronic driver's license renewal allowed pur-
suant to section 49-319(10), Idaho Code, shall be five dollars ($5.00) less
than the applicable application fee prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section. This fee reduction shall be accounted for by subtracting five dol-
lars ($5.00) from the portion of fees retained by the department.
(4) A person who applies for a driver's license or a driver's license
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) for
the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation. Such a contribution
shall be treated as a voluntary contribution to the organ donation contribu-
tion fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code, and not as a driver's li-
cense fee. Each voluntary contribution shall be deposited into the organ do-
nation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code.
(5) Every application shall state the applicant's true and full name,
date of birth, sex, declaration of Idaho residency, Idaho residence address


and mailing address if different, height, weight, hair color, eye color, and
social security number as verified by the social security administration.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state, in his or
her application pursuant to this section, the applicant's alternative Idaho
mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address and mail-
ing address. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-303(13), Idaho
Code, an applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver's license or
nondomiciled commercial learner's permit having residency in a state that
is prohibited from issuing class A, B or C driver's licenses or commercial
learner's permits, as provided in 49 CFR 384, is excepted from providing
proof of Idaho residency and an Idaho mailing address.
(a) The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number
as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to
applicants who have been assigned a social security number.
(b) An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number
shall:
(i) Present written verification from the social security admin-
istration that the applicant has not been assigned a social secu-
rity number; and
(ii) Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary
evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United
States; and
(iii) Submit such proof as the department may require that the ap-
plicant is lawfully present in the United States.
A driver's license, commercial learner's permit or any instruction
permit issued on and after January 1, 1993, shall not contain an appli-
cant's social security number. Applications on file shall be exempt
from disclosure except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203, 49-203A
and 49-204, Idaho Code.
(c) Every application for a class A, B or C license shall state where the
applicant has been licensed for the preceding ten (10) years and under
which of the following driving categories the applicant will operate:
(i) Non-excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects
to operate in interstate commerce and is required to provide a med-
ical examiner's certificate;
(ii) Excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to
operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in trans-
portation or operations excepted by the federal motor carrier
safety administration from all or parts of the qualification re-
quirements of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part
391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner's
certificate;
(iii) Non-excepted intrastate. The applicant operates only in
intrastate commerce and is subject to and meets all Idaho driver
qualification requirements and the applicable parts of federal
motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is required to
provide a medical examiner's certificate; or
(iv) Excepted intrastate. The applicant operates in intrastate
commerce, but engages exclusively in exempted transportation or


operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code, and the
applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49,
part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical exam-
iner's certificate.
All applications shall also state whether the applicant has previously
been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and by what state or country
and whether a driver's license or privileges have ever been suspended,
revoked, denied, disqualified, canceled or refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, disquali-
fication, cancellation or refusal and the applicant's oath that all
information is correct as signified by the applicant's signature.
(d) The applicant must submit proof of identity and citizenship sta-
tus acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as
set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate or a valid, unex-
pired passport. If the applicant does not possess a certified copy of
his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate and does not pos-
sess a valid, unexpired passport, another government-issued document
may be submitted that provides satisfactory evidence of a person's full
legal name and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the depart-
ment.
(e) Every applicant for a class A, B or C driver's license or commer-
cial learner's permit shall provide proof of United States citizenship
or lawful permanent residency in the United States upon application for
issuance, transfer, upgrade or renewal, unless the applicant's driving
record already contains documentation confirming United States citi-
zenship or lawful permanent residency. Every applicant for a nondomi-
ciled class A, B or C driver's license or commercial learner's permit
domiciled in a foreign country must provide an unexpired employment au-
thorization document issued by the department of homeland security or
an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form doc-
umenting the applicant's most recent admittance into the United States.
(f) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3 of
the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.,
as amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registra-
tion requirements in conjunction with an application for a driver's li-
cense, commercial learner's permit or instruction permit. Any regis-
tration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the department
to the selective service system.
(6) Whenever an application is received from a person previously li-
censed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of the
driver's record from the other jurisdiction and shall contact the national
driver register. When received, the driver's record from the previous ju-
risdiction shall become a part of the driver's record in this state with the
same force and effect as though entered on the driver's record in this state
in the original instance.
(7) Whenever the department receives a request for a driver's record
from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without
charge.
(8) The department shall contact and notify the commercial driver li-
cense information system of the proposed application for a class A, B or C


driver's license or commercial learner's permit to ensure identification of
the person and to obtain clearance to issue the license.
(9) The department shall request information from the drug and alco-
hol clearinghouse to determine whether an applicant for any class A, B, or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit is eligible for the creden-
tial.
(10) A contractor administering a class A, B, or C skills test may col-
lect an additional fee for the use of the contractor's vehicle for the skills
test.
(11) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who are employees of agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters,
farm retail outlets and suppliers, and livestock feeders that:
(a) Will be valid only for driving commercial vehicles that normally
require class B or C commercial driver's licenses;
(b) Will be valid for seasonal periods that begin on the date of is-
suance and that are not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in a
twelve (12) month period;
(c) May be obtained only twice in a driver's lifetime;
(d) Are valid only within a one-hundred-fifty (150) mile radius of the
place of business or farm being serviced; and
(e) Will be valid only in conjunction with valid Idaho class D driver's
licenses.
(12) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who:
(a) Have not violated the single license provisions of applicable fed-
eral regulations;
(b) Have not had any license suspensions, revocations or cancella-
tions;
(c) Have not had any convictions in any vehicle for any offense listed
in section 49-335(1) or (2), Idaho Code, or any one (1) serious traffic
offense;
(d) Have at least one (1) year of driving experience with a class D or
equivalent license in any type of motor vehicle; and
(e) Are at least sixteen (16) years old.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-336, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.